Washington statutes.
RCW 35.97.130

Revenue bonds and warrants—Holder may enforce.

If a municipality fails to set aside and pay into the special fund created for the payment of revenue bonds and warrants the amount which it has obligated itself in the ordinance or resolution creating the fund to set aside and pay therein, the holder of any bond or warrant issued against the bond may bring suit against the municipality to compel it to do so.

[ 1983 c 216 s 13.]